Utah statutes.
7-2-16.   Interim ratable dividends.
At any time after the expiration of the date fixed for the presentation of
claims and prior to the declaration of a final dividend the commissioner may,
out of the funds remaining in his hands after the payment of expenses, declare
and pay, subject to their priorities established under Section 7-2-15, one or
more interim ratable dividends to any person and in  the amount and upon such
notice as the court directs.
